Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.043

Vacations—Rules and regulations.

The several offices, departments and institutions of the state government may prescribe supplemental rules and regulations that are not inconsistent with the provisions of RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.043 with respect to vacation leave of subordinate officers and employees thereof.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.043. Prior: 1955 c 140 s 4.]